Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.760

Personal identification—Requests—Purpose—Applicants—Fee.

(1) Whenever a resident of this state appears before any law enforcement agency and requests an impression of his or her fingerprints to be made, such agency may comply with his or her request and make the required copies of the impressions on forms marked "Personal Identification". The required copies shall be forwarded to the section and marked "for personal identification only".

The section shall accept and file such fingerprints submitted voluntarily by such resident, for the purpose of securing a more certain and easy identification in case of death, injury, loss of memory, or other similar circumstances. Upon the request of such person, the section shall return his or her identification data.

(2) Whenever a person claiming to be a victim of identity theft appears before any law enforcement agency and requests an impression of his or her fingerprints to be made, such agency may comply with this request and make the required copies of the impressions on forms marked "Personal Identification." The required copies shall be forwarded to the section and marked "for personal identification only."

The section shall accept and file such fingerprints submitted by such resident, for the purpose of securing a more certain and easy identification in cases of identity theft. The section shall provide a statement showing that the victim's impression of fingerprints has been accepted and filed with the section.

The statement provided to the victim shall state clearly in twelve-point print:

"The person holding this statement has claimed to be a victim of identity theft. Pursuant to chapter 9.35 RCW, a business is required by law to provide this victim with copies of all relevant application and transaction information related to the transaction being alleged as a potential or actual identity theft. A business must provide this information once the victim makes a request in writing, shows this statement, any government issued photo identification card, and a copy of a police report."

Upon the request of such person, the section shall return his or her identification data.

(3) Whenever any person is an applicant for appointment to any position or is an applicant for employment or is an applicant for a license to be issued by any governmental agency, and the law or a regulation of such governmental agency requires that the applicant be of good moral character or not have been convicted of a crime, or is an applicant for appointment to or employment with a criminal justice agency, or the department, or is an applicant for the services of an international matchmaking organization, the applicant may request any law enforcement agency to make an impression of his or her fingerprints to be submitted to the section. The law enforcement agency may comply with such request and make copies of the impressions on forms marked "applicant", and submit such copies to the section.

The section shall accept such fingerprints and shall cause its files to be examined and shall promptly send to the appointing authority, employer, licensing authority, or international matchmaking organization indicated on the form of application, a transcript of the record of previous crimes committed by the person described on the data submitted, or a transcript of the *dependency record information regarding the person described on the data submitted, or if there is no record of his or her commission of any crimes, or if there is no *dependency record information, a statement to that effect.

(4) The Washington state patrol shall charge fees for processing of noncriminal justice system requests for criminal history record information pursuant to this section which will cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the patrol of processing such requests.

Any law enforcement agency may charge a fee not to exceed five dollars for the purpose of taking fingerprint impressions or searching its files of identification for noncriminal purposes.

[ 2002 c 115 s 5; 2001 c 217 s 3; 1985 c 201 s 15; 1983 c 184 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 13.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The definition for "dependency record information" was removed by 2006 c 294 s 2.

Effective date—2002 c 115: See RCW 19.220.900.

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.

Dissemination of information—Limitations—Disclaimer of liability: RCW 43.43.815.